Washington statutes.
RCW 41.76.035

Provisions relating to compensation—Restrictions.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, provisions of collective bargaining agreements relating to compensation shall not exceed the amount or percentage established by the legislature in the appropriations act. If any compensation provision is affected by subsequent modification of the appropriations act by the legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for the sole purpose of arriving at a mutually agreed upon replacement for the affected provision.

(2) An employer may provide additional compensation to faculty that exceeds that provided by the legislature.

[ 2002 c 356 s 10.]